Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE C. SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 7220. HIGH POINT SPECIAL UTILITY DISTRICT OF KAUFMAN AND ROCKWALL COUNTIES

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7220.0101. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of directors of the district.

(2) "Director" means a member of the board.

(3) "District" means the High Point Special Utility District of Kaufman and Rockwall Counties.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (H.B. 4617), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 7220.0201. COMPOSITION OF BOARD. The district is governed by a board of seven directors.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (H.B. 4617), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 7220.0202. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS FROM SINGLE-MEMBER DISTRICTS. (a) The board by rule may provide for the election of some or all of the directors from single-member districts.

(b) If the board provides for the election of some or all of the directors from single-member districts, to be eligible to be listed on the ballot as a candidate for or to serve as a director from a single-member district, a person must be a resident of that district.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 746 (H.B. 4617), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.